Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-242
Oaths; who may administer; seal.

(1) The election commissioner, county clerk, chief deputy election commissioners, office personnel of the election commissioner or county clerk, judges of election, precinct or district inspectors, and deputy registrars may administer all oaths required or necessary in the administration of the Election Act.

(2) The election commissioner or county clerk may adopt an official seal for use as prescribed by law.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 62;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 29.